Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.030

Designation of sending areas—Inclusion of agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance.

An eligible county must designate all agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance within its jurisdiction as sending areas for conservation under the eligible county's program for transfer of development rights. The development rights from all such agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance within the eligible counties must be available for transfer to receiving cities under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 318 s 301.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.